Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,289
Restraining orders and injunctions; department; county attorney; duties.

(1) The department may apply for a restraining order or a temporary or permanent injunction against any person violating or threatening to violate the Nebraska Pure Food Act, the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the act, or a final order of the director. The district court of the county where the violation is occurring or is about to occur shall have jurisdiction to grant such relief upon good cause shown. Relief may be granted notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law and shall be granted without bond.

(2) It shall be the duty of the county attorney of the county in which any violation of the act occurs or is about to occur, when notified of such violation or threatened violation by the department, to cause appropriate proceedings under subsection (1) of this section to be instituted and pursued in the district court without delay.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 39;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.35;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 58.